Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-833
Defective bridge on county or township line; notice; procedure.

If the road or bridge shall be on the line between two counties, then the members of the county boards of the respective districts, within which such road or bridge is located, of the respective counties, shall be served with such notice, or if it be on the line between two townships, in counties under township organization, then the supervisors of both townships in which the road or bridge is situated shall be notified in like manner.

Laws 1889, c. 7, § 3, p. 77;

R.S.1913, § 2994;

C.S.1922, § 2745;

C.S.1929, § 39-831;

R.S.1943, § 39-833.

Where mandamus is brought to compel building of county line bridge, notice must be given to both counties and both joined in action. State ex rel. Sumption v. Smith, 77 Neb. 1, 108 N.W. 173 (1906).